Louisiana, session 2026, HB542.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1667.1(A)(2)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1667.1. Rate of compensation; prior service; supplemental monthly compensation;
police to receive additional compensation
A.
* * *
(2)(a) Every sworn, commissioned law enforcement officer employed on a
full-time basis by a bona fide police agency of the state or its political subdivisions,
other than the Department of Public Safety and Corrections and the Department of
Wildlife and Fisheries, and headquartered in either the city of New Orleans, or Lake
Charles, or Baton Rouge and who serves the welfare of the public in the capacity of
a police officer by providing police services to the general public through effecting
arrests, issuing citations, and serving warrants while patrolling levees, waterways,
and riverfront areas, or while patrolling bridges that are within the boundaries of the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-307 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 542
city of New Orleans, or the city of Lake Charles, or the city of Baton Rouge shall be
paid by the state extra compensation in the amount of six hundred dollars per month
in addition to the compensation now paid to him by his employer out of
self-generated revenue attributable to the agency employing such officers. To be
eligible for the extra compensation, each such law enforcement officer shall have
completed one year of service, and any such law enforcement officer hired after
March 31, 1986, shall also have completed and passed a council-certified training
program, as provided in R.S. 40:2405.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.